New Jersey, session 221, S860.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Any law enforcement officer, firefighter, member of ambulance, first aid, or rescue squad, or other emergency personnel shall be immune from any liability for any damages resulting from breaking into a motor vehicle in which an animal has been left in conditions that the person reasonably believes are an immediate threat to the health of the animal and breaking into the vehicle is the last resort to rescue the animal from serious injury or loss of life. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.